src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-saali_gt-norm.yaml
# Author: Csilla HORVATH (Szeged Team)

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# todo:
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230502: Csilla)

  Noun - са̄лы: # "(eng) reindeer/(hun) rénszarvas/(rus) олень" - full paradigm

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom: са̄лы
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc: са̄лыт
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat: са̄лын
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl: са̄лыныл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins: са̄лыл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Tra: са̄лыиг

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom: са̄лыиг
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc: са̄лыигт
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat: са̄лыигн
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl: са̄лыигныл
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins: са̄лыигтыл

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom: са̄лыт
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc: са̄лытт
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat: са̄лытн
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl: са̄лытныл
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins: са̄лытыл

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: са̄лым
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: са̄лымт
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: са̄лымн
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: са̄лымныл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: са̄лымтыл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: са̄лымыг

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: са̄лыягум
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: са̄лыягумт
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: са̄лыягумн
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: са̄лыягумныл
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: са̄лыягумтыл

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: са̄лыянум
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: са̄лыянумт
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: са̄лыянумн
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: са̄лыянумныл
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: са̄лыянумтыл

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: са̄лын
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: са̄лынт
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: са̄лынн
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: са̄лынныл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: са̄лынтыл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: са̄лыныг

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [са̄лыягын, са̄лыягн]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: са̄лыягынт
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: са̄лыягынн
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: са̄лыягынныл
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: са̄лыягынтыл

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [са̄лыянын, са̄лыян]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [са̄лыянынт, са̄лыянт]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [са̄лыянынн, са̄лыянн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [са̄лыянынныл, са̄лыянныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [са̄лыянынтыл, са̄лыянтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: са̄лытэ
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [са̄лытэ̄т, са̄лытэт]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [са̄лытэ̄н, са̄лытэн]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [са̄лытэ̄ныл, са̄лытэныл]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: [са̄лытэ̄нтыл, са̄лытэнтыл]#
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: [са̄лытэ̄г, са̄лытэг]

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: са̄лыяге
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: [са̄лыяге̄т, са̄лыягет]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: [са̄лыяге̄н, са̄лыяген]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: [са̄лыяге̄ныл, са̄лыягеныл]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: [са̄лыяге̄тыл, са̄лыягетыл]

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: са̄лыянэ
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [са̄лыянэ̄т, са̄лыянэт]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [са̄лыянэ̄н, са̄лыянэн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [са̄лыянэ̄ныл, са̄лыянэныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: [са̄лыянэ̄тыл, са̄лыянэтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [са̄лыме̄н, са̄лымен]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [са̄лыме̄нт, са̄лымент]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [са̄лыме̄нн, са̄лыменн]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [са̄лыме̄нныл, са̄лыменныл]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [са̄лыме̄нтыл, са̄лыментыл]

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [са̄лыягаме̄н, са̄лыягамен, са̄лыягме̄н]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [са̄лыягаме̄нт, са̄лыягамент, са̄лыягме̄нт]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [са̄лыягаме̄нн, са̄лыягаменн, са̄лыягме̄нн]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [са̄лыягаме̄нныл, са̄лыягаменныл, са̄лыягме̄нныл]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [са̄лыягаме̄нтыл, са̄лыягаментыл, са̄лыягме̄нтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [са̄лыянме̄н, са̄лыянмен]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [са̄лыянме̄нт, са̄лыянмент]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [са̄лыянме̄нн, са̄лыянменн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [са̄лыянме̄нныл, са̄лыянменныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [са̄лыянме̄нтыл, са̄лыянментыл]

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [са̄лын, са̄лы̄н]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [са̄лынт, са̄лы̄нт]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [са̄лынн, са̄лы̄нн]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [са̄лынныл, са̄лы̄нныл]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [са̄лынтыл, са̄лы̄нтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [са̄лыягын, са̄лыягы̄н]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [са̄лыягынт, са̄лыягы̄нт]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [са̄лыягынн, са̄лыягы̄нн]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [са̄лыягынныл, са̄лыягы̄нныл]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [са̄лыягынтыл, са̄лыягы̄нтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [са̄лыянын, са̄лыяны̄н, са̄лыян]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [са̄лыянынт, са̄лыяны̄нт, са̄лыянт]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [са̄лыянынн, са̄лыяны̄нн, са̄лыянн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [са̄лыянынныл, са̄лыяны̄нныл, са̄лыянныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [са̄лыянынтыл, са̄лыяны̄нтыл, са̄лыянтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [са̄лытэ̄н, са̄лытэн]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [са̄лытэ̄нт, са̄лытэнт]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [са̄лытэ̄нн, са̄лытэнн]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [са̄лытэ̄нныл, са̄лытэнныл]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [са̄лытэ̄нтыл, са̄лытэнтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [са̄лыяге̄н, са̄лыяген]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [са̄лыяге̄нт, са̄лыягент]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [са̄лыяге̄нн, са̄лыягенн]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [са̄лыяге̄нныл, са̄лыягенныл]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [са̄лыяге̄нтыл, са̄лыягентыл]

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [са̄лыянэ̄н, са̄лыянэн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [са̄лыянэ̄нт, са̄лыянэнт]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [са̄лыянэ̄нн, са̄лыянэнн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [са̄лыянэ̄нныл, са̄лыянэнныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [са̄лыянэ̄нтыл, са̄лыянэнтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: са̄лыюв
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: са̄лыювт
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: са̄лыювн
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: са̄лыювныл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: са̄лыювтыл

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: са̄лыягув
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: са̄лыягувт
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: са̄лыягувн
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: са̄лыягувныл
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: са̄лыягувтыл

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: са̄лыянув
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: са̄лыянувт
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: са̄лыянувн
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: са̄лыянувныл
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: са̄лыянувтыл

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [са̄лын, са̄лы̄н]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [са̄лынт, са̄лы̄нт]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [са̄лынн, са̄лы̄нн]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [са̄лынныл, са̄лы̄нныл]
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [са̄лынтыл, са̄лы̄нтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [са̄лыягын, са̄лыягы̄н]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [са̄лыягынт, са̄лыягы̄нт]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [са̄лыягынн, са̄лыягы̄нн]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [са̄лыягынныл, са̄лыягы̄нныл]
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [са̄лыягынтыл, са̄лыягы̄нтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [са̄лыянын, са̄лыяны̄н, са̄лыян]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [са̄лыянынт, са̄лыяны̄нт, са̄лыянт]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [са̄лыянынн, са̄лыяны̄нн, са̄лыянн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [са̄лыянынныл, са̄лыяны̄нныл, са̄лыянныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [са̄лыянынтыл, са̄лыяны̄нтыл, са̄лыянтыл]

     са̄лы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: са̄лыяныл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: са̄лыянылт
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: са̄лыянылн
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: са̄лыянылныл
     са̄лы+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: са̄лыянылтыл

     са̄лы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: са̄лыяганыл
     са̄лы+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: са̄лыяганылт
     са̄лы+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: са̄лыяганылн
     са̄лы+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: са̄лыяганылныл
     са̄лы+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: са̄лыяганылтыл

     са̄лы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [са̄лыянаныл, са̄лыяныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [са̄лыянанылт, са̄лыянылт]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [са̄лыянанылн, са̄лыянылн]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [са̄лыянанылныл, са̄лыянылныл]
     са̄лы+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [са̄лыянанылтыл, са̄лыянылтыл]
